src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NMN_SIÂKˈK
!! Sg_Nom: vow_di:vow_high:pal_no:cns_gem_long
!!! pos="nominal"
!!! syll_count-in-Sg_Nom="1"
!!! stem-ends-in="consonant"
!!! stem_vowel-in-Sg_Loc="â"
!!! stem_with_gradation="yes"
!! 1.1.1.1.1.1. Sg_Nom="diphthong|long_geminate" Sg_Gen="diphthong|geminate" Sg_Ill="diphthong|vowel_e-coloration|long_geminate"

! gradation: yes
!!  is for words with ''-âst'' Loc but ''-ense'' Ill 3rd grade
!! !!1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 167)
!! !!1.1 Sg.Loc in -âst (no vowel shift, all raised)
!! !!  â-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! !!1.1.1 Sg.Ill vowel	-e
!! !!1.1.1.1 Has Palatalization
!! !!1.1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
!! !!  Palatalized: Sg.Ill
!! !!  Not Palatalized: ELSE
!! !!    Sg.Ill in palatalization and -e
!! !!  Has Allophonic palatalization
!! !!1.1.1.1[1].2 Has Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
!! !!1.1.1.1[1].2.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
!! !!1.1.1.1[1].2.1[] (Diphthong + Consonant and Consonant Geminate alternation)
!! !!  Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
!! !!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
!! !!  Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
!! !!FORMS
!! !!(9) Der/Dimin.N.Sg.Nom: siâkkâž
!! siâkˈk:siâkˈk
!! ** Yaml: __N-siakk__

 ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;			  !!= * @CODE@ siâkˈk
: SG-NOM ;	    			  !!= * @CODE@ siâkˈk
:%^CCC2CC SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM ;	  !!= * @CODE@ siâkk
:%^PALE%^PAL%>e SG-ILL ;		  !!= * @CODE@ sieʹǩˈǩe
+Der/N2A:%^PALE%^PAL N2A_LUÕʹSSI ;	  !!= * @CODE@ sieʹǩˈǩi
:%^CCC2CC%>â SG-LOC ;		 	  !!= * @CODE@ (4) Sg.Loc: siâkkâst
:%^CCC2CC SG-COM_IN ;			  !!= * @CODE@ (5) Sg.Com: siâkkin
:%>â ESS/PAR ; 	    !!= * @CODE@ (6) Ess: siâkˈkân
:%^CCC2CC PL-OBL ;  !!= * @CODE@ (8) Pl.Acc: siâkkid

+Der/Dimin+N:%^CCC2CC N_MUÕRÂŽ-WITHOUT-PAL ;  !!= * @CODE@ siâkk-
+Der/Dimin+N:%^PALE%^PAL%^CCC2CC N_MUÕRÂŽ-WITH-PAL ;  !!= * @CODE@ sieʹǩǩ-

HatÂ-STEM-PX-RETAIN ;
:%^CCC2CC HatÂ-STEM-PX-WEAKEN ;
:%^CCC2CC HatÂ-STEM-PX-WEAKEN_NG ;
:%^Allegro%^CCC2C HatÂ-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ;
: HatÂ-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN ;

!!!
LEXICON N_MIÂRKK !!= * @CODE@ sǩiâŋkk:sǩiâŋkk
+N: NMN_MIÂRKK ;
LEXICON NMN_MIÂRKK
!! Sg_Nom: vow_di:vow_high:pal_no:cns_xyy
!!! pos="nominal"
!!! syll_count-in-Sg_Nom="1"
!!! stem-ends-in="consonant"
!!! stem_vowel-in-Sg_Loc="â"
!!! stem_with_gradation="yes"
!! 1.1.1.1.1.1. Sg_Nom="diphthong|long_cluster" Sg_Gen="diphthong|short_cluster" Sg_Ill="diphthong|vowel_e-coloration|long_cluster"

! foot: 2syll
! diphthong: no
! vowel_shift: no
! consonant: cluster
! gradation: yes2
! weak_grade: short
! strong_grade: long
! stem_vowel-in-Sg_Loc: âst
! Sg.Ill: palatalization-AND-e
!! !!1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 167)
!! !!1.1 Sg.Loc in -âst (no vowel shift, all raised)
!! !!  â-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! !!1.1.1 Sg.Ill vowel	-e
!! !!1.1.1.1 Has Palatalization
!! !!1.1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
!! !!  Palatalized: Sg.Ill
!! !!  Not Palatalized: ELSE
!! !!    Sg.Ill in palatalization and -e
!! !!1.1.1.1[1].1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
!! !!1.1.1.1[1].1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
!! !!1.1.1.1[1].1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Cluster alternation)
!! !!  Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
!! !!  Strong grade: Sg.Ill
!! !!  Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
!! !!FORMS
!! ** Yaml: __N-skjiankk__
!! 
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;	!!= * @CODE@ (1) Sg.Nom: sǩiâŋkk
: SG-NOM ;	      	!!= * @CODE@ (1) Sg.Nom: sǩiâŋkk
:%^XYY2XY SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM ;  !!= * @CODE@ (2) Pl.Nom: sǩiâŋk
:%^PALE%^PAL%>e SG-ILL ;	   !!= * @CODE@ (3) Sg.Ill: sǩieʹŋǩǩe
+Der/N2A:%^PALE%^PAL N2A_LUÕʹSSI ;   !!= * @CODE@ N»A: sǩieʹŋǩǩi
:%^XYY2XY%>â SG-LOC ;   	   !!= * @CODE@ (4) Sg.Loc: sǩiâŋkâst
:%^XYY2XY SG-COM_IN ;		   !!= * @CODE@ (5) Sg.Com: sǩiâŋkin
:%>â ESS/PAR ; 	     		   !!= * @CODE@	(6) Ess: sǩiâŋkkân
:%^XYY2XY PL-OBL ;		!!= * @CODE@	(8) Pl.Acc: sǩiâŋkid

+Der/Dimin+N:%^XYY2XY N_MUÕRÂŽ-WITHOUT-PAL ;  !!= * @CODE@ sǩiâŋk-
+Der/Dimin+N:%^PALE%^PAL%^XYY2XY N_MUÕRÂŽ-WITH-PAL ;  !!= * @CODE@ sǩieʹŋǩ-

HatÂ-STEM-PX-RETAIN ;
:%^XYY2XY HatÂ-STEM-PX-WEAKEN ;
:%^XYY2XY HatÂ-STEM-PX-WEAKEN_NG ;
:%^Allegro%^XYY2XY HatÂ-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ;
: HatÂ-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN ;



!!!

LEXICON N_TOLL !!= * @CODE@ toll:toll
!! similar_to: N_ÄŊŊ, N_KÕÕNJÂL
+N: NMN_TOLL ;
LEXICON NMN_TOLL
!! Sg_Nom: vow_mono:vow_short:vow_high:pal_no:cns_gem
!!! pos="nominal"
!!! syll_count-in-Sg_Nom="1"
!!! stem-ends-in="consonant"
!!! stem_vowel-in-Sg_Loc="â"
!!! stem_with_gradation="yes" 
!! 1.1.1.1.1.2. Sg_Nom="short_vowel|geminate" Sg_Gen="long_vowel|single_consonant" 

!! See also: NMN_TOLL-PLC, which is the same, but minus PL forms and certain cases
! foot: 2syll
! diphthong: no
! vowel_shift: no
! consonant: geminate-single
! gradation: yes2
! weak_grade: single
! strong_grade: no
! stem_vowel-in-Sg_Loc: âst
! Sg.Ill: palatalization-AND-e
!! !!1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 167)
!! !!1.1 Sg.Loc in -âst (no vowel shift, all raised)
!! !!  â-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! !!1.1.1 Sg.Ill vowel	-e
!! !!1.1.1.1 Has Palatalization
!! !!1.1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
!! !!  Palatalized: Sg.Ill
!! !!  Not Palatalized: ELSE
!! !!    Sg.Ill in palatalization and -e
!! !!1.1.1.1[1].1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
!! !!1.1.1.1[1].1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
!! !!1.1.1.1[1].1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant and Consonant Geminate alternation)
!! !!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
!! !!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
!! !!  Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
!! !!FORMS
!! ** Yaml: __N-kidd, N-soll, N-toll, N-vorr__
!! strong_geminate, short_vowel, no_palatalization, high_stem_vowel 
 ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;	  !!= * @CODE@ toll
: SG-NOM ;	    	  !!= * @CODE@ toll
:%>â ESS/PAR ;    		  !!= * @CODE@ tollân
!! strong_geminate, short_vowel, palatalization, high_stem_vowel
:%^PAL%>e SG-ILL ;   	  !!= * @CODE@ toʹlle
+Der/N2A:%^PAL N2A_LUÕʹSSI ;   	  !!= * @CODE@ toʹlli
!! single_consonant, long_vowel, no_palatalization, high_stem_vowel
:%^V2VV%^CC2C SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;	!!= * @CODE@ tool
:%^V2VV%^CC2C PL-NOM ;	!!= * @CODE@ tool
:%^V2VV%^CC2C%>â SG-LOC ;               !!= * @CODE@ toolâst
:%^V2VV%^CC2C SG-COM_IN ;               !!= * @CODE@ toolin
:%^V2VV%^CC2C PL-OBL ;	                !!= * @CODE@ tooli, toolid, toolid, toolin, toolivuiʹm, toolitaa

+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV%^CC2C N_MUÕRÂŽ-WITHOUT-PAL ;  !!= * @CODE@ tool-
!! single_consonant, long_vowel, palatalization, high_stem_vowel
+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV%^PAL%^CC2C N_MUÕRÂŽ-WITH-PAL ;  !!= * @CODE@ tooʹl-

HatÂ-STEM-PX-RETAIN ;
:%^V2VV%^CC2C HatÂ-STEM-PX-WEAKEN ;
:%^V2VV%^CC2C HatÂ-STEM-PX-WEAKEN_NG ;
:%^CC2C HatÂ-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ;
 HatÂ-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN ;

LEXICON N_TOLL-PL
+N: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; !!= * @CODE@ toll
+N:%>â ESS/PAR ;         !!= * @CODE@ tollân
+N:%^V2VV%^CC2C PL-NOM ; !!= * @CODE@ tool
+N:%^V2VV%^CC2C PL-OBL ; !!= * @CODE@ tooli, toolid, toolid, toolin, toolivuiʹm, toolitaa

 
!!!
LEXICON N_SIJDD !!= * @CODE@ sijdd:sijdd
+N: NMN_SIJDD ;
