src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N-INCOMING
alggǩiđđ:alggǩi%^1VOWđđ N_TOLL ;
busslinnj:bussli%^1VOWnnj N_TOLL ;
ceerkavsijdd:ceerkav#sijdd N_SIJDD ;
cisttnõmm:cisttnõ%^1VOWmm N_TOLL ;
ciõpârjpiâckk:ciõpârjpiâckk N_MIÂRKK ;
cõõkkitoll:cõõkkito%^1VOWll N_TOLL ;
håiddjemdomm:håiddjemdo%^1VOWmm N_TOLL ;
jeäʹǩǩes-sǩiâŋkk:jeäʹǩǩes-sǩiâŋkk N_MIÂRKK ;
jieʹnnipeiʹvvsǩiâŋkk:jieʹnnipeiʹvvsǩiâŋkk N_MIÂRKK ;
jieʹttmiârkk:jieʹtt#miârkk N_MIÂRKK ;
jiârgg:jiârgg N_MIÂRKK ;
jiõnnliântt:jiõnn#liântt N_MIÂRKK ;
joorrikõpp:joorrikõ%^1VOWpp N_TOLL ;
joukkdomm:joukkdo%^1VOWmm N_TOLL ;
juʹvjjpiâckk:juʹvjjpiâckk N_MIÂRKK ;
jääʹmmemkõpp:jääʹmmemkõ%^1VOWpp N_TOLL ;
jõnnreppjoŋŋ:jõnnreppjo%^1VOWŋŋ N_TOLL ;
katarr:kata%^1VOWrr N_TOLL ;
kontekstouddmiârkk:kontekstoudd#miârkk N_MIÂRKK ;
korall:kora%^1VOWll N_TOLL ;
kruuggšurr:kruuggšu%^1VOWrr N_TOLL ;
kueʹddemliântt:kueʹddem#liântt N_MIÂRKK ;
kueʹttuhss:kueʹttuhss N_SIJDD ;
kufeetârtoll:kufeetârto%^1VOWll N_TOLL ;
kurr:ku%^1VOWrr N_TOLL ;
kuâlddšõŋŋ:kuâlddšõ%^1VOWŋŋ N_TOLL ;
kuâlggmiârkk:kuâlgg#miârkk N_MIÂRKK ;
kuäʹccevmååsk-kõrrpiâckk:kuäʹcˈcevmååsk-kõrrpiâckk N_MIÂRKK ;
kuålgg:kuålgg N_MIÂRKK ;
kuålggmiârkk:kuålgg#miârkk N_MIÂRKK ;
kuålvv:kuålvv N_MIÂRKK ;
kuõstšõŋŋ:kuõstšõ%^1VOWŋŋ N_TOLL ;
kääzzkâʹsttemdomm:kääzzkâʹsttemdo%^1VOWmm N_TOLL ;
käʹrdduhss:käʹrdduhss N_SIJDD ;
kåʹrnnkõrr:kåʹrnnkõ%^1VOWrr N_TOLL ;
kåʹssliântt:kåʹss#liântt N_MIÂRKK ;
kåʹssliântt:kåʹss#liântt N_MIÂRKK ;
kõskkmiârkk:kõskkmiârkk N_MIÂRKK ;
kõõččâm-miârkk:kõõččâm-#miârkk N_MIÂRKK ;
kõččâmkõpp:kõččâmkõ%^1VOWpp N_TOLL ;
laiʹnnʼjem-miârkk:laiʹnnʼjem-#miârkk N_MIÂRKK ;
ledmmvõrr:ledmmvõ%^1VOWrr N_TOLL ;
leiʹnnpuus:leiʹnnpuus N_SIJDD ;
leiʹǧǧuhss:leiʹǧǧuhss N_SIJDD ;
lijmm:lijmm N_SIJDD ;
linnj:li%^1VOWnnj N_TOLL ;
lokkuhss:lokkuhss N_SIJDD ;
loppsumm:loppsu%^1VOWmm N_TOLL ;
luʹvddtuõʹllʼjeeikurr:luʹvddtuõʹllʼjeeiku%^1VOWrr N_TOLL ;
läʹǧǧstem-miârkk:läʹǧǧstem-#miârkk N_MIÂRKK ;
meäʹccsektorr:meäʹcc#sekto%^1VOWrr N_TOLL ;
mollvuâssõkpiâckk:mollvuâssõkpiâckk N_MIÂRKK ;
mošttmiârkk:moštt#miârkk N_MIÂRKK ;
måʹhššnjuhčč:måʹhšš#njuhčč N_SIJDD ;
neʹttuhss:neʹttuhss N_SIJDD ;
njaammikõpp:njaammikõ%^1VOWpp N_TOLL ;
njaaʹrblpiâckk:njaaʹrblpiâckk N_MIÂRKK ;
njueʹrččtoll:njueʹrččto%^1VOWll N_TOLL ;
nueʹttpõtt:nueʹtˈt#põ%^1VOWtt N_TOLL ;
nuõrttsääʹmsijdd:nuõrttsääʹm#sijdd N_SIJDD ;
nââmarjiârgg:nââmar#jiârgg N_MIÂRKK ;
paassšõŋŋ:paassšõ%^1VOWŋŋ N_TOLL ;
palggâzuhss:palggâzuhss N_SIJDD ;
pađvvnõđđ:pađvvnõ%^1VOWđđ N_TOLL ;
peäʹssliântt:peäʹsˈs#liântt N_MIÂRKK ;
peäʹsslõmm:peäʹsˈs#lõ%^1VOWmm N_TOLL ;
peʹlljkõpp:peʹlljkõ%^1VOWpp N_TOLL ;
peʹlljmiârkk:peʹllj#miârkk N_MIÂRKK ;
pieʹccmååsk-kõrrpiâckk:pieʹccmååsk-kõrrpiâckk N_MIÂRKK ;
piiđmiârkk:piiđ#miârkk N_MIÂRKK ;
porrjemjiârgg:porrjem#jiârgg N_MIÂRKK ;
privatsektorr:privat#sekto%^1VOWrr N_TOLL ;
pričas-sǩiâŋkk:pričas-sǩiâŋkk N_MIÂRKK ;
puâǥǥkõpp:puâǥǥ#kõ%^1VOWpp N_TOLL ;
puäjkõrr:puäjkõ%^1VOWrr N_TOLL ;
puåššuhss:puåššuhss N_SIJDD ;
puõlâšvijmm:puõlâšvijmm N_SIJDD ;
pâššnemkõpp:pâššnemkõ%^1VOWpp N_TOLL ;
pååddalsijmm:pååddal#sijmm N_SIJDD ;
pååttaǩkõrr:pååttaǩkõ%^1VOWrr N_TOLL ;
pååttaǩpiâŋkk:pååttaǩpiâŋkk N_MIÂRKK ;
põrttuhss:põrttuhss N_SIJDD ;
põttkurr:põttku%^1VOWrr N_TOLL ;
rekiʹsttersijdd:rekiʹstter#sijdd N_SIJDD ;
reʹnntoll:reʹnnto%^1VOWll N_TOLL ;
riântt:riântt N_MIÂRKK ;
riizenliântt:riizen#liântt N_MIÂRKK ;
rosttovsǩiâŋkk:rosttovsǩiâŋkk N_MIÂRKK ;
ruʹčǩǩesill:ruʹčǩǩesi%^1VOWll N_TOLL ;
rääkk-kõpp:rääkk-kõ%^1VOWpp N_TOLL ;
räättkõrrpiâckk:räättkõrrpiâckk N_MIÂRKK ;
räʹtǩǩeem-miârkk:räʹtǩǩeem-#miârkk N_MIÂRKK ;
seuʹlluhss:seuʹlluhss N_SIJDD ;
sijvv:sijvv N_SIJDD ;
snäʹrǩǩpuhss:snäʹrǩǩpuhss N_SIJDD ;
spaʹlččpiâckk:spaʹlččpiâckk N_MIÂRKK ;
summ:su%^1VOWmm N_TOLL ;
sääʹmsijdd:sääʹm#sijdd N_SIJDD ;
sõmm:sõ%^1VOWmm N_TOLL ;
tall:ta%^1VOWll N_TOLL ;
teâttõsnõmm:teâttõsnõ%^1VOWmm N_TOLL ;
teäʹǧǧsǩiâŋkk:teäʹǧǧ#sǩiâŋkk N_MIÂRKK ;
tobddâm-miârkk:tobddâm-#miârkk N_MIÂRKK ;
tool:to%^1VOWll N_TOLL-PL ;
torr:to%^1VOWrr N_TOLL ;
trafikkmiârkk:trafikk#miârkk N_MIÂRKK ;
tuâjj-jiârgg:tuâjj-#jiârgg N_MIÂRKK ;
tuâǥǥuhss:tuâǥǥuhss N_SIJDD ;
tuåimmtemšurr:tuåimmtemšu%^1VOWrr N_TOLL ;
täʹvvermiârkk:täʹvver#miârkk N_MIÂRKK ;
uuidâm-miârkk:uuidâm-miârkk N_MIÂRKK ;
uuʹlecnõmm:uuʹlec#nõ%^1VOWmm N_TOLL ;
vaartem-miârkk:vaartem-#miârkk N_MIÂRKK ;
veäʹšǩǩmiârkk:veäʹšǩǩ#miârkk N_MIÂRKK ;
viʹsǩǩeskõpp:viʹsǩǩeskõ%^1VOWpp N_TOLL ;
vueʹlluhss:vueʹlluhss N_SIJDD ;
vueʹlǧǧeem-miârkk:vueʹlǧǧeem-#miârkk N_MIÂRKK ;
vueʹsttsǩiâŋkk:vueʹsttsǩiâŋkk N_MIÂRKK ;
vueʹsttʼsǩiâŋkk:vueʹsttʼsǩiâŋkk N_MIÂRKK ;
vuäʹlǧǧsõll:vuäʹlǧǧsõ%^1VOWll N_TOLL ;
vuõlâsuhss:vuõlâsuhss N_SIJDD ;
võđđ:võ%^1VOWđđ N_TOLL ;
vääʹrruhss:vääʹrruhss N_SIJDD ;
ähššnõđđ:ähššnõ%^1VOWđđ N_TOLL ;
äiʹǧǧmiârkk:äiʹǧǧ#miârkk N_MIÂRKK ;
čiistjiârgg:čiist#jiârgg N_MIÂRKK ;
čiõʹljkõpp:čiõʹljkõ%^1VOWpp N_TOLL ;
čorrsijdd:čorr#sijdd N_SIJDD ;
čuuʹppiǩluhtt:čuuʹppiǩluhtt N_SIJDD ;
čuõvvmiârkk:čuõvvmiârkk N_MIÂRKK ;
čårrsijdd:čårr#sijdd N_SIJDD ;
čårruhss:čårruhss N_SIJDD ;
čåuʹjjkatarr:čåuʹjjkata%^1VOWrr N_TOLL ;
čåuʹjjuhss:čåuʹjjuhss N_SIJDD ;
šõddâmpeiʹvvsǩiâŋkk:šõddâmpeiʹvvsǩiâŋkk N_MIÂRKK ;
ǩeäʹdǧǧill:ǩeäʹdǧǧi%^1VOWll N_TOLL ;
ǩeʹddpååʹštmiârkk:ǩeʹdd#pååʹšt#miârkk N_MIÂRKK ;
ǩieʹss-sijdd:ǩieʹss-#sijdd N_SIJDD ;
ǩiõlluhss:ǩiõll#uhss N_SIJDD ;
